Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-5,212
Conveyance Advisory Committee; created; members; terms; expenses; meetings.

(1) The Conveyance Advisory Committee is created. One member shall be the state elevator inspector employed pursuant to section 81-5,221. The Governor shall appoint the other members of the committee as follows: One representative from a major elevator manufacturing company; one representative from an elevator servicing company; one representative who is a building manager; one representative who is an elevator mechanic; and one representative of the general public from each county that has a population of more than one hundred thousand inhabitants.

(2) The members of the committee appointed by the Governor shall serve for terms of three years, except that of the initial members appointed, two shall serve for terms of one year and three shall serve for terms of two years. The state elevator inspector shall serve continuously. The appointed members shall be reimbursed for expenses for service on the committee as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. The members of the committee shall elect a chairperson who shall be the deciding vote in the event of a tie vote.

(3) The committee shall meet and organize within thirty days after the appointment of the members. The committee shall meet quarterly at a time and place to be fixed by the committee for the consideration of code regulations and for the transaction of such other business as properly comes before it. Special meetings may be called by the chairperson or at the request of two or more members of the committee. Any appointed committee member absent from three consecutive meetings shall be dismissed.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB265, § 28;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2503;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 48;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 103.
January 1, 2021